src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/afr-za-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Afrikaans Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
# -----------
#-name: Afrikaans verkort
#-index-name: Afrikaans, contracted
#-display-name: Afrikaans contracted braille
#
#+language:af
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#+system:ubc-af
#
# "UBC" stands for "Unified Braille Code" and is a generalization of UEB.
# See https://sabrailleauthority.org.za/unified-braille-code-ubc.
# ------------
#
# Afrikaans is one of the 11 official languages in South Africa and is
# among the top 3 most widely spoken local languages. It is a language
# closely related to Dutch and uses the same alphabet, but in addition
# it makes frequent use of the following diacritic marks on vowels:
# acute and grave accent, circumflex and umlaut.
#
# The first braille system for Afrikaans was developed in about
# 1935. After the adoption of the UEB in 2004 in Toronto, Canada, we
# also unified the Afrikaans braille code according to the principles
# of the UEB. The grade 1 code is identical to grade 1 UEB. Grade 2
# has 183 contractions. Each letter of the alphabet except the letter
# u (which is a word on its own) represents a contraction in grade
# 2. As with UEB, we eliminated the contractions which could cause
# ambiguity. In one respect Afrikaans braille is simpler than UEB, but
# in another respect it is more complex: It is simpler in that it does
# not have the complexity around shortforms found in UEB grade 2. It
# is more complex because of linguistic reasons. In Afrikaans compound
# words are frequently created on the fly and this can cause
# contraction issues at word boundaries.
#
# We do not use additional codes such as Nemeth or computer braille
# codes; we use our unified Afrikaans code also for technical
# material.
#
#  Copyright (C) 2019 Greg Kearney <gkearney@gmail.com>
#  Copyright (C) 2019-2021 South African Braille Authority <http://www.sabrailleauthority.org.za>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>
#
#  Maintained by Christo de Klerk <cjdk@mweb.co.za>

# Begin entries

# Some sign definitions which might otherwise conflict with Afrikaans contractions:
sign \x00b0 56-45-245 °
sign \x00a7 56-45-234 § section
sign \x2122 56-45-2345 ™
sign \x25cb 56-1246-123456 ○   circle

include afr-za-g1.ctb
include IPA-unicode-range.uti

multind 56-6 nocontractsign capsletter

seqdelimiter -—
seqdelimiter ‐   \x2010
seqdelimiter ‑   \x2011
seqdelimiter –   \x2013
seqdelimiter —   \x2014
seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘
seqafterchars  )]}"”'’.,;:.!?…

noback correct "’" "'"
noback correct "ŉ" "'n"

attribute 1 AEIOUYÊËaeiouyêë vowels
attribute 2 BCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXZbcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz consonants
attribute 3 +=*,.;:?!"'“”‘’  punctuation with only lower dots (except hyphens)

# Shape symbols require a grade 1 indicator (Section 3.22.1)
contraction \x25a0 ■ filled (solid) square
contraction \x25a1 □ square
contraction \x25a7 ▧ shaded square (upper left to lower right)
contraction \x25b2 ▲ filled (solid) (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25b3 △ regular (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25cb ○ circle
contraction \x25cd ◍ shaded circle

# match expressions

#.
noback match %[^_] . %[^_#l] 56-256

#a
noback match %2 ai ER|er 1-24
noback match - al E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|END|end|ER%[^_.]|er%[^_.]|EREG|ereg|ERS|ers|I%[^_.]|i%[^_.]|IAS|ias|IES|ies|IG|ig|ING|ing|IË|ië 1-123
noback match %a al AAT|aat|AT|at|IE|ie 1-123
noback match kr al E|e 1-123
noback match - an E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|ER%[^_.]|er%[^_.]|ERS|ers|IAK|iak|IES|ies|IG|ig|IK[AU]|ik[au]|US|us 1-1345
noback match %[^_.](MEL|mel|Mel|[DdFfMm]) anie %[^_.] 1-1345-1456

#b
noback match - be FF|ff|KK|kk|KM|km|LL|ll|SS|ss|TT|tt|T%[^_.]|t%[^_.]|NE%[^_.]|ne%[^_.]|SIE%[^_.]|sie%[^_.]|SIES|sies|SIG%[^_.]|sig%[^_.]|SIG!T|sig!t|SWIL|swil|TE%[^_.]|te%[^_.]|TENH|tenh|TH|th 12-15
noback match %[^_.] be %2%[^_.]|[Ll]%2 12-15
noback match [dfghjklnprst] be [Ll]%[^_.]|[Ll]%2 12-15
noback match - bed %[^_.]|E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|EL%[^_.]|el%[^_.]|ELA|ela|ELT|elt|EV|ev|[BDFGHJKLMNPSTVbdfghjklmnpstv] 12-15-145
noback match - bek %[^_.]|AF|af|ER|er|[Kk] 12-15-13
noback match - ben %[^_.]|%2 12-26
noback match - beo fi|lo|gr 12-15
noback match %a ber IES|ies|ING|ing|IË|ië 12-15-1235
noback match - ber %[^_.]|AAL|aal|ALE|ale|ALES|ales|ALIS|alis|![AEIOUYaeiouy] 12-12456
noback match - besig h 12-15-234-24-1245
noback match - best E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|ES|es 12-15-34
noback match - betal e|ing 23-2345-1-123
noback match - bew e%[^_.]|end|erasie|erig 12-15-2456
noback match - binne %[^_.]|N!S|n!s|[AaBbDdFfGgHhJjKkLlMmOoPpRrSsTtVvWw] 12-35-1345-15

#d
noback match - dag END|end|ER|er|ING|ing|IO|io 145-1-1245
noback match %[^_.] dan IEL|iel|IËL|iël 145-1-1345
noback match - dani G|g 145-1-1345-24
noback match - dat ARIS|aris|EER|eer|ERING|ering|EUR|eur 456-2346
noback match - dat %1 145-1-2345
noback match - de REG|reg 145-15
noback match - die U|u 145-24-15
noback match AR|ar der END|end|ING|ing 145-15-1235
noback match - disk - 145-24-16

#e
noback match %[^_.] ek '[SsTt] 15-13
noback match WES|wes en [Ee]%[^_.]|ES%[^_.]|es%[^_.] 26
noback match [BbMmSs] en [Ee]%[^_.]|ES%[^_.]|es%[^_.] 15-1345
noback match %a en AME|ame|AAM|aam|ESTE|este|IG|ig|OMMER|ommer 15-1345
noback match %[^_.] en E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|ERS|ers|ETJIE|etjie|IG|ig 15-1345
noback match [Ss] en ING|ing|[Uu] 15-1345
noback match [LlMm] en ER%[^_.]|er%[^_.]|ER!G|er!g|IG|ig|ING|ing 15-1345
noback match %2 enag %[^_.]|TE|te 15-1345-1-1245
noback match %a eni GEND|gend|GING|ging 15-1345-24
noback match %2 er EEKS|eeks 15-1235
noback match %a er EKENING|ekening|EKENA|ekena|EKENM|ekenm|ANGS|angs|OK%[^_.]|ok%[^_.]|OKK|okk|ESERW|eserw|OOS|oos|OSE|ose 15-1235
noback match %[^_.] era %[^_.]|S%[^_.]|s%[^_.] 15-1235-1
noback match ALLOK|allok|FISK|fisk|ID|id|IN|in|ION|ion|IT|it|L|l|MK|mk|PARK|park|R|r|REG|reg|RN|rn|SED|sed|SKAND|skand|SOEN|soen|TRAST|trast|V|v|%2U|%2u er END|end|ING|ing 15-1235
noback match SM|sm er END|end|IG|ig|ING|ing 15-1235
noback match UM|um er IES|ies|ING|ing 15-1235
noback match %a erisiko - 15-1235-24-234-24-13-135

#g
noback match - ge MM|mm|NIA|nia|SPE%[^_.]|spe%[^_.]|SPES%[^_.]|spes%[^_.]|TE%[^_.]|te%[^_.]|TIES|ties|WEL%[^_.]|wel%[^_.]|WELS|wels|WER%[^_.]|wer%[^_.]|WERS%[^_.]|wers%[^_.] 1245-15
noback match %[^_.] ge NE%[^_.]|ne%[^_.]|NER%[^_.]|ner%[^_.] 1245-15
noback match OE|oe|[DdGgSsTt] ge WEND|wend|WING|wing 1245-15
noback match BE|be ge REND|rend|RIG|rig 1245-15
noback match - ge WE%[^_.]|we%[^_.]|WENE|wene|WER%[^_.]|wer%[^_.]WING|wing 1245-15
noback match - gek %[^_.]|[HhKkSs] 1245-15-13
noback match REN|ren gel [Dd] 123456-123
noback match - gel D%[^_.]|d%[^_.]|DE%[^_.]|de%[^_.]|DELIK|delik|DEND|dend|DER|der|DIG|dig|DING|ding|DJIE|djie|DEENH|deenh|DOOR|door|DWAARD|dwaard|DWESE|dwese|[Dd][BbDdFfGgHhJjKkLlMmNnPpSsTtVv]|E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|ER%[^_.]|er%[^_.]|LING|ling 1245-15-123
noback match - gen %[^_.]|%2 1245-26
noback match %a ger IË|ië 1245-15-1235
noback match LE|le|NE|ne ger END|end|ING|ing 1245-15-1235
noback match - ger %[^_.]|%2 1245-12456
noback match DRIN|drin|G|g|HON|hon ger IG|ig 1245-12456
noback match %[^_.] gewel DAK|dak|[BbGgHhJjKkLlMmNnPpRrSsTtVv] 1245-15-2456-15-123
noback match UIT|uit gewer [SsYy] 1245-15-2456-12456
noback match - gron E|d 1245-1235-25

#h
noback match - hal end|er|ing 125-1-123
noback match - her E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|EREG|ereg|ETJIE|etjie 125-15-1235

#k
noback match - kamper END|end|ING|ing 13-1-134-1234-15-1235
noback match %[^_.] kana %[^_.] 13-1-1345-1
noback match %[^_.]|[FfGgMmTt]|IN|in ker END|end|ING|ing 13-15-1235
noback match - kom EDI|edi 5-13
noback match - kom [Aa]%[^_.]|AS%[^_.]|as%[^_.]|E|e|IE|ie|ING|ing 13-135-134

#l

#m
noback match - man e%[^_.]|end|ing 134-1-1345
noback match KAL|kal mer END|end|ING|ing 134-15-1235
noback match %[^_.]|ND|nd mer E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|EN|en 134-15-1235
noback match - met E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|END|end|ER|er|ING|ing|REKK|rekk 134-15-2345

#o
noback match %a of AKT|akt|IES%[^_.]|ies%[^_.]|IESE|iese|OON|oon|ONE|one 135-124
noback match GEL|gel|H|h|KL|kl|%[^_.]R|%[^_.]r|ST|st ofie - 135-124-1456
noback match DISTR|distr|PR|pr of EET|eet|ES|es|ET|et|IE|ie 12356
noback match %a on E%[^_.]|e%[^_.]|ES%[^_.]|es%[^_.]|END|end|IES|ies|IG|ig|IUM|ium|ER%[^_.]|er%[^_.]|ERS|ers|ING%[^_.]|ing%[^_.]|ING%2|ing%2 135-1345
noback match SEREM|serem on IE%[^_.]|ie%[^_.]|IE%2|ie%2 135-1345
noback match - on AAl|aal|ALE|ale|EEL|eel|ELE|ele|ÊR|êr 25
noback match %[^_.] outon [Oo] 1256-2345-25

#p

#r
noback match - reklame %2 1235-15-13-123-1-134-15

#s
noback match - self OON|oon|(ONE|one)%[^_.] 234-15-123-124
noback match %a ser end|ing 234-15-1235
noback match [AaIi] sien - 234-1456-1345
noback match [AaIi] sienet - 234-1456-45-1345
noback match arbeid sk - 234-13
noback match %a sk AART|aart|AMP|amp|ANAAL|anaal|ANALE|anale|APTEIN|aptein 234-13
noback match %a sk AJ|aj|AMER|amer|ANT|ant|APASI|apasi|ARTEL|artel|AS|as|ATALO|atalo|ELK|elk|EUS|eus|ETT|ett|N|n|OEL|oel 234-13
noback match %a sk ANSEL|ansel|ANTO|anto|EURIG|eurig|IND%[^_.]|ind%[^_.]|INDERS|inders|NEG|neg|NOOP|noop|NOPE|nope|OEK|oek|OEP|oep|OER|oer|OETS|oets|OFFER|offer|OFFIE|offie|OLOM|olom|OOPK|oopk|ORPS|orps|ORREL|orrel 234-13
noback match %a sk ODE|ode|OERS|oers|OLL|oll|OLONI|oloni|ONF|onf|ONS|ons|ONT|ont|OOR%[^_.]|oor%[^_.]|ORPOR|orpor|ORTING|orting|OS|os|RAAN|raan|RANE|rane|RAFF|raff|RAG%[^_.]|rag%[^_.]|RAGTE|ragte|RAGTIG|ragtig|REDIT|redit|RING|ring|RISIS|risis|ROEG|roeg|RUI|rui|RYT|ryt|UIKEN|uiken|UIP|uip|UNS|uns|W|w 234-13
noback match DE|de|WI|wi skund [EeIi] 16-136-1345-145
noback match %2 sk [Rr][Ee][Ee][Tt]%[^_.]|[Rr][Ee][Tt][Ee]%[^_.]|(US|us)%[^_.] 234-13
noback match FER|fer|ROT|rot|VI|vi sk UIL|uil 234-13
noback match %a skler A|a|E 234-13-123-12456
noback match %a skom [BbPpSs] 234-5-13
noback match %a skry [GgTt] 234-5-13456
noback match %a st AAK|aak|AAL|aal|AFEL|afel|AK%[^_.]|ak%[^_.]|AKK|akk|ALIG|alig|ARIE[FW]|arie[fw]|AS%[^_.]|as%[^_.]|ASS|ass|EGN|egn|EKEN|eken|EMPER|emper|EMPO|empo|ENNIS|ennis|ERREIN|errein|ESOU|esou|ITEL|itel|J|j|ONEEL|oneel|ONELE|onele|ORING|oring|RANS|rans|RANT|rant|REIN|rein|ROEP|roep|ROTS|rots|RUST|rust|AKTI|akti|ALENT|alent|EMA%[^_.]|ema%[^_.]|EMAS%[^_.]|emas%[^_.]|ENTOON|entoon|OGA%[^_.]|oga%[^_.]|OGAS|ogas|RUI%[^_.]|rui%[^_.]|RUIE|ruie|UIN|uin|W|w|YE%[^_.]|ye%[^_.] 234-2345
noback match ARBEID|arbeid st AND|and 34
noback match KIE|kie st AND|and 234-2345
noback match BO|bo|BOSSIE|bossie st EE|ee 234-2345
noback match !(%[^_.]EK|%[^_.]ek) st RADISI|radisi 234-2345
noback match %a ste AT|at|[Hh]|KORT|kort|OR|or|RAP|rap 234-235
noback match ![aeiou]|%[^_.] stene %[^_.] 34-15-1345-15
noback match %a ster m%[^_.]|me%[^_.]|min|myn 234-2345-12456
noback match %a stoe LAAG|laag|LAE|lae|LAT|lat|NA|na|R|r|TS|ts|[BDGJKSVbdgjksv] 234-2345-246
noback match - streng ER|er 34-1235-26-1245
